Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1576.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-214.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-214.01. Certification requirements; private school teachers; blind and visually impaired pupils; rules A. Notwithstanding section 15-161, the state board of education shall require teachers who provide instruction to pupils who are blind or visually impaired in a private school in this state to either: 1. Obtain a valid certification for teachers who provide instruction to pupils who are blind or visually impaired that is issued by either: (a) A nationally recognized board that certifies professionals who work with individuals who are blind or visually impaired in education and rehabilitation. (b) An internationally recognized organization that certifies professionals who serve individuals who are blind or visually impaired. 2. Successfully complete a university-level teacher preparation program that meets or exceeds standards prescribed by the state board of education for teachers who educate pupils who are blind and visually impaired. B. The state board of education may adopt rules to implement this section. END_STATUTE